Maryland, session 2026, HB1560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–101(d) through (n) of Article – Natural Resources of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–101(e) through (o), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(D) “ECOLOGICAL VALUE” MEANS THE QUANTITATIVE VALUE OF BENEFITS
THAT ECOSYSTEMS PROVIDE TO THE ENVIRONMENT, INCLUDING CLEAN AIR AND
WATER, POLLINATION, CARBON SEQUESTRATION, BIODIVERSITY, WILDLIFE
HABITAT, STORMWATER AND FLOOD MANAGEMENT, CLIMATE MITIGATION, AND
OTHER BENEFITS.
5–102.
(b) It is the policy of the State to encourage the retention and sustainable
management of forest lands by:
(1) Achieving no net loss of forest;
(2) Affording due consideration to the protection and retention of forests in
the State through existing land conservation programs where they have the highest value
in terms of promoting the State’s compliance with its clean water goals under the 2014
Chesapeake Bay Watershed Agreement and the 2007 Forestry Conservation Initiative;

HOUSE BILL 1560 5
(3) Enhancing the retention of privately owned forest lands through
research–based educational outreach efforts to landowners by the State’s forest
conservancy district boards;
(4) Developing financial incentives to encourage landowners to retain and
manage their forests sustainably and in a manner that is consistent with a forest
stewardship plan, including by allowing landowners to use forests on State lands that are
reforested or afforested under Subtitle 16 of this title after July 1, 2022, to satisfy buffer or
insurance provisions required by registries or protocols associated with private forest
carbon credit transactions;
(5) ESTABLISHING A SCIENCE–BASED METHODOLOGY TO QUANTIFY
THE ECOLOGICAL VALUE OF FOREST ECOSYSTEM BENEFITS AS A FOUNDATION FOR
COMPENSATING PRIVATE FOREST LANDOWNERS FOR FOREST EXPANSION,
RETENTION, AND PRESERVATION AND ASSESSING IMPACTS RESULTING FROM
FOREST LOSS;
(6) ESTABLISHING AND MANAGING A FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE
INCENTIVES FUND TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL INCENTIVES FOR
LONG–TERM EXPANSION, RETENTION, AND PRESERVATION OF FOREST LAND AND
THE ADOPTION OF ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS
THROUGH EXISTING AND NEW PROGRAMS FOR PRIVATE FOREST LANDOWNERS;
(7) ENHANCING EXISTING PROGRAMS AND DEVELOPING NEW
PROGRAMS TO COMPENSATE FOREST LANDOWNERS FOR PRESERVING, ENHANCING,
AND RESTORING THE HIGH–VALUE ECOSYSTEM BENEFITS THAT FOREST LAND
PROVIDES, INCLUDING A PILOT PROJECT TO SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE THE
NUMBER OF FOREST LANDOWNERS IN STATE–DESIGNATED TARGETED ECOLOGICAL
AREAS AGREEING TO ADOPT A NEW ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLAN;
[(5)] (8) Promoting renewable energy policies and markets with increased
emphasis on the use of in–State produced woody biomass;
[(6)] (9) Ensuring dual certification of the State’s forests by the Forest
Stewardship Council and the Sustainable Forestry Initiative;
[(7)] (10) Recognizing the importance of:
(i) A viable forest products industry to the economies of rural
Maryland;
(ii) Continued development of fiber products; and

HOUSE BILL 1560
(iii) Maryland’s green infrastructure; and
[(8)] (11) Developing and enhancing programs with a sustainable forestry
component, including a forest mitigation banking system, a carbon credit or carbon
sequestration program, a clean water credit trading system, an environmental services
credit trading program, and a renewable energy credit trading system.
5–102.2.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) COMPLETE AND PUBLISH A FORMAL APPROACH FOR
DETERMINING THE ECOLOGICAL VALUE OF FOREST LAND; AND
(2) DEMONSTRATE HOW THE APPROACH WILL BE APPLIED TO
CREATING LANDOWNER COMPENSATION INCENTIVES, GENERATING ECOSYSTEM
VALUE IMPACT FEES, AND CREATING OTHER NEW PROGRAMS FOR FOREST
EXPANSION AND RETENTION.
(B) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH OTHER
RELEVANT STATE AGENCIES, SHALL IMMEDIATELY PURSUE LAWS AND POLICIES TO
GENERATE FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE IMPACT FEE REVENUES FOR ACTIVITIES
RESULTING IN THE LOSS OF THE ECOLOGICAL VALUE OF FOREST LAND.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER PURSUING
ASSESSMENTS FOR THE TOTAL LOSS OF FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE AGAINST:
1. NEW DATA CENTERS AND UTILITY LINE
CONSTRUCTION THAT SERVES NEW DATA CENTERS; AND
2. OTHER PROJECTS THAT CAUSE A SIGNIFICANT LOSS
OF THE ECOLOGICAL VALUE OF FOREST LAND.
(2) FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE IMPACT FEE REVENUES ASSESSED
AND COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE FOREST
ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVES FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF
THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A PILOT PROGRAM FOR ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED
FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL INCENTIVES FOR
ENROLLING AND EXTENDING COMMITMENTS TO FOREST CONSERVATION AND
MANAGEMENT THROUGH FOREST CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT
AGREEMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1560 7
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP THE FRAMEWORK FOR THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(II) DESIGNATE TARGETED ECOLOGICAL AREAS THAT ARE
PRIORITY AREAS FOR APPLYING ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLANS;
(III) MAKE REGULATORY OR PURSUE LEGISLATIVE
ADJUSTMENTS AS NECESSARY; AND
(IV) TRANSFER PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION TO THE MARYLAND
FOREST FOUNDATION ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2030, IF THE PILOT PROGRAM
RESULTS IN AN INCREASE IN ENROLLMENT IN FOREST CONSERVATION AND
MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS.
(3) A FOREST CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT
UNDER AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN SHALL BE
FOR AT LEAST 20 YEARS.
(4) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR ENROLLMENT IN AN ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE PROPERTY SHOULD LARGELY BE LOCATED IN
DEPARTMENT–DESIGNATED TARGETED ECOLOGICAL AREAS TO ENSURE THAT
FUNDING IS FOCUSED ON THE MOST ECOLOGICALLY VALUABLE FOREST LANDS;
(II) THE LANDOWNER SHALL AGREE TO ENROLL IN A LEGALLY
BINDING FOREST CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT; AND
(III) THE PROGRAM SHALL BE LIMITED TO FOREST LAND TO
WHICH:
1. A FOREST CONSERVATION MANAGEMENT
AGREEMENT DOES NOT APPLY OR IS SIGNIFICANTLY EXPANDED IN SCOPE; OR
2. A STANDARD FOREST STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPLIES
AND FOR WHICH THE OWNER AGREES TO ADOPT AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED
FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 1560
(5) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR AN
ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN BY USING A STANDARD
FOREST STEWARDSHIP PLAN AS A BASELINE.
(II) IN ADDITION TO THE CRITERIA UNDER A STANDARD FOREST
STEWARDSHIP PLAN, AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT
PLAN SHALL:
1. PROVIDE A 20–YEAR ACTION–ORIENTED PLAN FOR
CONSERVING, ENHANCING, AND RESTORING ON–SITE ECOLOGICAL ATTRIBUTES
AND HIGH–VALUE ECOSYSTEM BENEFITS;
2. REDUCE THE IMPACTS OF ECOLOGICAL STRESSORS,
INCLUDING ANY INVASIVE SPECIES;
3. INCORPORATE A 20–YEAR CLIMATE CHANGE
FORECAST; AND
4. INCLUDE A COMPLETE CHARACTERIZATION OF
THESE AND OTHER RELEVANT FEATURES OF THE FOREST LAND AND PROVIDE A
COMPREHENSIVE FOREST STAND INVENTORY.
(6) ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS
SHALL:
(I) FOLLOW THE GUIDANCE POLICIES DEVELOPED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) REQUIRE THAT LANDOWNERS ADHERE TO THE FOREST
PRACTICE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND IN EFFECT AT THE
TIME OF THE PLAN’S APPROVAL.
(7) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ENACT OR ADOPT
ORDINANCES OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING AREAS COVERED BY AN ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN THAT ARE INCONSISTENT WITH, OR
LESS STRINGENT THAN, THE FOREST MANAGEMENT REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT FOR FOREST LAND MANAGED UNDER AN APPROVED ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN.
(D) (1) (I) PAYMENTS UNDER AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED
FOREST MANAGEMENT PLAN ARE SOLELY INTENDED TO COMPENSATE THE
LANDOWNER FOR ADOPTING OR EXTENDING A FOREST CONSERVATION AND
MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1560 9
(II) OPPORTUNITIES TO GENERATE ECOSYSTEM VALUE
CREDITS, INCLUDING THROUGH CONSERVATION MANAGEMENT ACTIONS OR
RESTORATION, AND TO PARTICIPATE IN ECOSYSTEM VALUE MARKETS, MAY NOT BE
LIMITED BY THE IMPLEMENTATION OF AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLAN.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE PAYMENT
MECHANISM FOR ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS ON
OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027.
(II) IN DETERMINING THE PAYMENT MECHANISM, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER FACTORS INCLUDING:
1. WHETHER PAYMENTS ARE TO BE ON A PERIODICAL
OR A LUMP SUM BASIS;
2. THE THRESHOLD AMOUNTS NECESSARY TO
INCENTIVIZE LANDOWNER ADOPTION OF AN ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLAN; AND
3. HOW TO BALANCE PAYMENTS AGAINST FOREST
ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVES FUND ASSETS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND
FORESTRY FOUNDATION AND THE FOREST DISTRICT CONSERVANCY BOARDS,
SHALL ESTABLISH EDUCATIONAL OUTREACH TO FOREST LANDOWNERS ELIGIBLE
FOR ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS TO ENSURE
LANDOWNERS ARE AWARE OF THE AVAILABILITY OF THE PLANS.
(F) AFTER THE TRANSFER OF THE PILOT PROGRAM TO THE MARYLAND
FORESTRY FOUNDATION, THE MARYLAND FORESTRY FOUNDATION SHALL REPORT
TO THE DEPARTMENT EVERY 2 YEARS ON:
(1) THE ACHIEVEMENTS UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(2) NEW MECHANISMS TO INCREASE THE NUMBER OF FOREST
LANDOWNERS WHO HAVE ADOPTED ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLANS; AND
(3) AN ESTIMATE OF INCREASED AND PROJECTED CARBON
SEQUESTRATION AND ANY OTHER ECOLOGICAL VALUE BENEFITS.

HOUSE BILL 1560
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE ENHANCEMENTS TO PROGRAMS
THAT IMPLEMENT ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS BY
PURSUING ADDITIONAL ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVE PAYMENTS, INCLUDING:
(1) ADDITIONAL STATE PROPERTY TAX BENEFITS NOT TO EXCEED
10% OF THE LANDOWNER’S LOCAL PROPERTY TAX BENEFIT PER ACRE PER YEAR
FOR THE LENGTH OF THE ADOPTED ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST
MANAGEMENT PLAN;
(2) CLIMATE RESILIENCE EASEMENTS TO ENSURE THAT ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS ACCOUNT FOR CLIMATE CHANGE;
AND
(3) PAYMENTS UNDER STATE–FUNDED RESTORATION AND
CONSERVATION PROGRAMS THAT PROVIDE BONUS PAYMENTS TO FOREST
LANDOWNERS ACCEPTING FOREST RESTORATION AND CONSERVATION EASEMENTS
TO ACCOUNT FOR ECOSYSTEM VALUE GENERATED, ENHANCED, OR RETAINED.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL USES OF THE FOREST
ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVES FUND AS PAYMENTS FOR ECOSYSTEM VALUE
PRODUCE LONG–TERM ECOLOGICAL BENEFITS AND DO NOT GENERATE
UNINTENDED NEGATIVE CONSEQUENCES TO OVERALL FOREST HEALTH.
(I) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE FOREST ECOSYSTEM
VALUE INCENTIVES FUND.
(2) THERE IS A FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVES FUND.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL
FINANCIAL INCENTIVES FOR LONG–TERM RETENTION, EXPANSION, AND
PRESERVATION OF FOREST LAND AND FOR THE ADOPTION OF ECOLOGICAL
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS THROUGH EXISTING AND NEW
PROGRAMS FOR PRIVATE FOREST LANDOWNERS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(5) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:

HOUSE BILL 1560 11
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(II) ECOSYSTEM VALUE IMPACT FEES GENERATED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) ANY LEGAL SETTLEMENTS DIRECTED TO THE FUND;
(IV) VOLUNTARY CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE FUND;
(V) GRANTS TO THE FUND;
(VI) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(7) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(I) USING $2,000,000 OF THE APPROPRIATION REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (11) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
1. TO DEVELOP A PLAN FOR INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT
THAT WILL GENERATE ANNUAL REVENUE THROUGH BOTH TRADITIONAL MARKET
INVESTMENTS AND EMERGING CONSERVATION FINANCING OPPORTUNITIES;
2. TO DEVELOP A BLUEPRINT FOR ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FORESTRY MANAGEMENT PLANS; AND
3. TO DEVELOP AND REVIEW ADDITIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES TO COMPENSATE FOREST LANDOWNERS FOR FOREST ECOLOGICAL
VALUE BENEFITS; AND
(II) TO FINANCE IMPLEMENTATION OF ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FORESTRY MANAGEMENT PLANS AND ADDITIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES TO COMPENSATE FOREST LANDOWNERS FOR FOREST ECOLOGICAL
VALUE BENEFITS.
(8) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND JOINTLY WITH AN INVESTMENT FUND MANAGEMENT ENTITY WITH
EXPERIENCE WITH CONSERVATION FINANCING.

HOUSE BILL 1560
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(9) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(10) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FORESTRY MANAGEMENT PLANS AND ADDITIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES TO COMPENSATE FOREST LANDOWNERS FOR FOREST ECOLOGICAL
VALUE BENEFITS IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE
OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR FOREST
CONSERVATION MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS AND OTHER FOREST CONSERVATION
FINANCING PROGRAMS.
(11) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $10,000,000 TO THE FUND.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE FOREST ECOSYSTEM VALUE INCENTIVES FUND.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources

HOUSE BILL 1560 13
5–102.
(b) It is the policy of the State to encourage the retention and sustainable
management of forest lands by:
(1) Achieving no net loss of forest;
(2) Affording due consideration to the protection and retention of forests in
the State through existing land conservation programs where they have the highest value
in terms of promoting the State’s compliance with its clean water goals under the 2014
Chesapeake Bay Watershed Agreement and the 2007 Forestry Conservation Initiative;
(3) Enhancing the retention of privately owned forest lands through
research–based educational outreach efforts to landowners by the State’s forest
conservancy district boards;
(4) Developing financial incentives to encourage landowners to retain and
manage their forests sustainably and in a manner that is consistent with a forest
stewardship plan, including by allowing landowners to use forests on State lands that are
reforested or afforested under Subtitle 16 of this title after July 1, 2022, to satisfy buffer or
insurance provisions required by registries or protocols associated with private forest
carbon credit transactions;
(5) Establishing a science–based methodology to quantify the ecological
value of forest ecosystem benefits as a foundation for compensating private forest
landowners for forest expansion, retention, and preservation and assessing impacts
resulting from forest loss;
(6) [Establishing and managing a Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives Fund
to provide additional financial incentives for long–term expansion, retention, and
preservation of forest land and the adoption of ecosystem value–oriented forest
management plans through existing and new programs for private forest landowners;
(7)] Enhancing existing programs and developing new programs to
compensate forest landowners for preserving, enhancing, and restoring the high–value
ecosystem benefits that forest land provides, including a pilot project to significantly
increase the number of forest landowners in State–designated targeted ecological areas
agreeing to adopt a new ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan;
[(8)] (7) Promoting renewable energy policies and markets with increased
emphasis on the use of in–State produced woody biomass;
[(9)] (8) Ensuring dual certification of the State’s forests by the Forest
Stewardship Council and the Sustainable Forestry Initiative;
[(10)] (9) Recognizing the importance of:

HOUSE BILL 1560
(i) A viable forest products industry to the economies of rural
Maryland;
(ii) Continued development of fiber products; and
(iii) Maryland’s green infrastructure; and
[(11)] (10) Developing and enhancing programs with a sustainable forestry
component, including a forest mitigation banking system, a carbon credit or carbon
sequestration program, a clean water credit trading system, an environmental services
credit trading program, and a renewable energy credit trading system.
5–102.2.
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department shall:
(1) Complete and publish a formal approach for determining the ecological
value of forest land; and
(2) Demonstrate how the approach will be applied to creating landowner
compensation incentives, generating ecosystem value impact fees, and creating other new
programs for forest expansion and retention.
(b) (1) (i) The Department, in coordination with other relevant State
agencies, shall immediately pursue laws and policies to generate forest ecosystem value
impact fee revenues for activities resulting in the loss of the ecological value of forest land.
(ii) The Department shall consider pursuing assessments for the
total loss of forest ecosystem value against:
1. New data centers and utility line construction that serves
new data centers; and
2. Other projects that cause a significant loss of the ecological
value of forest land.
(2) Forest ecosystem value impact fee revenues assessed and collected
under this subsection shall be remitted to the [Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives Fund
established under subsection (i) of this section] DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL
FINANCIAL INCENTIVES FOR LONG–TERM EXPANSION, RETENTION, AND
PRESERVATION OF FOREST LAND AND THE ADOPTION OF ECOSYSTEM
VALUE–ORIENTED FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS THROUGH EXISTING AND NEW
PROGRAMS FOR PRIVATE FOREST LANDOWNERS.
(c) (1) On or before October 1, 2027, the Department shall establish and
implement a pilot program for ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans to

HOUSE BILL 1560 15
provide additional incentives for enrolling and extending commitments to forest
conservation and management through forest conservation and management agreements.
(2) The Department shall:
(i) Develop the framework for the pilot program;
(ii) Designate targeted ecological areas that are priority areas for
applying ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans;
(iii) Make regulatory or pursue legislative adjustments as necessary;
(iv) Transfer program administration to the Maryland Forest
Foundation on or before October 1, 2030 if the pilot program results in an increase in
enrollment in forest conservation and management agreements.
(3) A forest conservation and management agreement under an ecosystem
value–oriented forest management plan shall be for at least 20 years.
(4) Eligibility criteria for enrollment in an ecosystem value–oriented forest
management plan shall include as follows:
(i) The property should largely be located in
Department–designated targeted ecological areas to ensure that funding is focused on the
most ecologically valuable forest lands;
(ii) The landowner shall agree to enroll in a legally binding forest
conservation and management agreement; and
(iii) The program shall be limited to forest land to which:
1. A forest conservation management agreement does not
apply or is significantly expanded in scope; or
2. A standard forest stewardship plan applies and for which
the owner agrees to adopt an ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan.
(5) (i) The Department shall establish criteria for an ecosystem
value–oriented forest management plan by using a standard forest stewardship plan as a
baseline.
(ii) In addition to the criteria under a standard forest stewardship
plan, an ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan shall:
1. Provide a 20–year action–oriented plan for conserving,
enhancing, and restoring on–site ecological attributes and high–value ecosystem benefits;

HOUSE BILL 1560
2. Reduce the impacts of ecological stressors, including any
invasive species;
3. Incorporate a 20–year climate change forecast; and
4. Include a complete characterization of these and other
relevant features of the forest land and provide a comprehensive forest stand inventory.
(6) Ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans shall:
(i) Follow the guidance policies developed by the Department; and
(ii) Require that landowners adhere to the forest practice
regulations adopted by the Department and in effect at the time of the plan’s approval.
(7) A county or municipality may not enact or adopt ordinances or
regulations governing areas covered by an ecosystem value–oriented forest management
plan that are inconsistent with, or less stringent than, the forest management regulations
adopted by the Department for forest land managed under an approved ecosystem
value–oriented forest management plan.
(d) (1) (i) Payments under an ecosystem value–oriented forest
management plan are solely intended to compensate the landowner for adopting or
extending a forest conservation and management agreement.
(ii) Opportunities to generate ecosystem value credits, including
through conservation management actions or restoration, and to participate in ecosystem
value markets, may not be limited by the implementation of an ecosystem value–oriented
forest management plan.
(2) (i) The Department shall determine the payment mechanism for
ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans on or before October 1, 2027.
(ii) In determining the payment mechanism, the Department shall
consider factors including:
1. Whether payments are to be on a periodical or a lump sum
basis;
2. The threshold amounts necessary to incentivize
landowner adoption of an ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan; and
3. How to balance payments against [Forest Ecosystem
Value Incentives Fund] assets AVAILABLE FOR THE ECOSYSTEM VALUE–ORIENTED
FOREST MANAGEMENT PLANS.

HOUSE BILL 1560 17
(e) The Department, in coordination with the Maryland Forestry Foundation and
the forest district conservancy boards, shall establish educational outreach to forest
landowners eligible for ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans to ensure
landowners are aware of the availability of the plans.
(f) After the transfer of the pilot program to the Maryland Forestry Foundation,
the Maryland Forestry Foundation shall report to the Department every 2 years on:
(1) The achievements under the pilot program;
(2) New mechanisms to increase the number of forest landowners who have
adopted ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans; and
(3) An estimate of increased and projected carbon sequestration and any
other ecological value benefits.
(g) The Department shall evaluate enhancements to programs that implement
ecosystem value–oriented forest management plans by pursuing additional ecosystem
value incentive payments, including:
(1) Additional State property tax benefits not to exceed 10% of the
landowner’s local property tax benefit per acre per year for the length of the adopted
ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan;
(2) Climate resilience easements to ensure that ecosystem value–oriented
forest management plans account for climate change; and
(3) Payments under State–funded restoration and conservation programs
that provide bonus payments to forest landowners accepting forest restoration and
conservation easements to account for ecosystem value generated, enhanced, or retained.
(h) The Department shall ensure that all [uses of the Forest Ecosystem Value
Incentives Fund as] payments for ecosystem value produce long–term ecological benefits
and do not generate unintended negative consequences to overall forest health.
[(i) (1) In this subsection, “Fund” means Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives
Fund.
(2) There is an Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives Fund.
(3) The purpose of the Fund is to provide additional financial incentives for
long–term retention, expansion, and preservation of forest land and for the adoption of
ecological value–oriented forest management plans through existing and new programs for
private forest landowners.
(4) The Department shall administer the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1560
(5) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(6) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) Ecosystem value impact fees generated under subsection (b) of
this section;
(iii) Any legal settlements directed to the Fund;
(iv) Voluntary contributions to the Fund;
(v) Grants to the Fund;
(vi) Interest earnings; and
(vii) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
(7) The Fund may be used only for:
(i) Using $2 million of the appropriation required under paragraph
(11) of this section:
1. To develop a plan for investment management that will
generate annual revenue through both traditional market investments and emerging
conservation financing opportunities;
2. To develop a blueprint for ecosystem value–oriented
forestry management plans; and
3. To develop and review of additional opportunities to
compensate forest landowners for forest ecological value benefits; and
(ii) To finance implementation of ecosystem value–oriented forestry
management plans and additional opportunities to compensate forest landowners for forest
ecological value benefits.
(8) (i) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund jointly
with an investment fund management entity with experience with conservation financing.
(ii) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1560 19
(9) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
(10) Money expended from the Fund for ecosystem value–oriented forestry
management plans and additional opportunities to compensate forest landowners for forest
ecological value benefits is supplemental to and is not intended to take the place of funding
that otherwise would be appropriated for forest conservation management agreements and
other forest conservation financing programs.
(11) For fiscal year 2028, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 to the Fund.]
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; AND
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund[; and]
[214. the Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives Fund].
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2027, the Maryland Forestry Foundation, in cooperation with the Department of Natural
Resources, shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on methods of increasing the number of forest landowners entering
into a forest conservation and management agreement under § 8–211 of the Tax – Property
Article or in an ecosystem value–oriented forest management plan to assist in achieving
Maryland’s land conservation goals under the Maryland the Beautiful Act of 2023 and
Maryland’s climate change mitigation goals under the Climate Solutions Now Act of 2022.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2050, the Department of Natural Resources, in consultation with the Maryland Forestry

HOUSE BILL 1560
Foundation, shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on the effectiveness of the Forest Ecosystem Value Incentives Fund,
including a recommendation on whether an extension of the Forest Ecosystem Value
Incentives Fund is warranted.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2051.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.